Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.44.193

Criminal trespass against children—Covered entities.

(1) An owner, manager, or operator of a covered entity may order a covered offender from the legal premises of a covered entity as provided under this section. To do this, the owner, manager, or operator of a covered entity must first provide the covered offender, or cause the covered offender to be provided, personal service of a written notice that informs the covered offender that:

(a) The covered offender must leave the legal premises of the covered entity and may not return without the written permission of the covered entity; and

(b) If the covered offender refuses to leave the legal premises of the covered entity, or thereafter returns and enters within the legal premises of the covered entity without written permission, the offender may be charged and prosecuted for a felony offense as provided in RCW 9A.44.196.

(2) A covered entity may give written permission of entry and use to a covered offender to enter and remain on the legal premises of the covered entity at particular times and for lawful purposes, including, but not limited to, conducting business, voting, or participating in educational or recreational activities. Any written permission of entry and use of the legal premises of a covered entity must be clearly stated in a written document and must be personally served on the covered offender. If the covered offender violates the conditions of entry and use contained in a written document personally served on the offender by the covered entity, the covered offender may be charged and prosecuted for a felony offense as provided in RCW 9A.44.196.

(3) An owner, employee, or agent of a covered entity shall be immune from civil liability for damages arising from excluding or failing to exclude a covered offender from a covered entity or from imposing or failing to impose conditions of entry and use on a covered offender.

(4) A person provided with written notice from a covered entity under this section may file a petition with the district court alleging that he or she does not meet the definition of "covered offender" in RCW 9A.44.190. The district court must conduct a hearing on the petition within thirty days of the petition being filed. In the hearing on the petition, the person has the burden of proving that he or she is not a covered offender. If the court finds, by a preponderance of the evidence, that the person is not a covered offender, the court shall order the covered entity to rescind the written notice and shall order the covered entity to pay the person's costs and reasonable attorneys' fees.

[ 2006 c 126 s 5; 2006 c 125 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2006 c 126 ss 1 and 3-7: See note following RCW 9A.44.130.

Intent—Severability—Effective date—2006 c 125: See notes following RCW 9A.44.190.